Hawaii statutes.
[PART VII.]
REVIEW OF TAX CREDITS, EXCLUSIONS, AND DEDUCTIONS

Note

Part effective July 1, 2018.

[§23-91] Review of certain credits,
exclusions, and deductions under the income tax and financial institutions tax.
(a) The auditor shall conduct a review of the tax credits, exclusions, and
deductions listed in sections 23-92 to 23-96.

(b) In the review of a credit, exclusion, or
deduction, the auditor shall:

(1) Determine the amount of tax expenditure for the
credit, exclusion, or deduction for each of the previous three fiscal years;

(2) Estimate the amount of tax expenditure for the
credit, exclusion, or deduction for the current fiscal year and the next two
fiscal years;

(3) Determine whether the credit, exclusion, or
deduction has achieved and continues to achieve the purpose for which it was
enacted by the legislature;

(4) Determine whether the credit, exclusion, or
deduction is necessary to promote or preserve tax equity or efficiency;

(5) If the credit, exclusion, or deduction was enacted
because of its purported economic or employment benefit to the State:

(A) Determine whether a benefit has resulted,
and if so, quantify to the extent possible the estimated benefit directly
attributable to the credit, exclusion, or deduction; and

(B) Comment on whether the benefit, if any,
outweighs the cost of the credit, exclusion, or deduction; and

(6) Estimate the annual cost of the credit,
exclusion, or deduction per low-income resident of the State. For purposes of
this paragraph, a "low-income resident of the State" means an
individual who is a resident of the State and:

(A) Is the only member of a family of one and
has an income of not more than eighty per cent of the area median income for a
family of one; or

(B) Is part of a family with an income of not
more than eighty per cent of the area median income for a family of the same
size.

The cost shall be estimated by dividing the
annual tax expenditure for the credit, exclusion, or deduction for each fiscal
year under review by the number of low-income residents of the State in the
fiscal year. The estimate determined pursuant to this paragraph is intended to
display the effect on low-income residents of the State if they directly
receive, either through tax reduction or negative tax, the dollars saved by
elimination of the credit, exclusion, or deduction.

(c) Based on the review, the auditor shall
recommend whether the credit, exclusion, or deduction should be retained
without modification, amended, or repealed.

The auditor may recommend that a credit,
exclusion, or deduction be removed from review under sections 23-92 to 23-96.
[L 2016, c 245, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next